id family group language idiom type genlang_point map chapter value1 feature1 value2 feature2 source page comment contributor imperative form plural form example_as_in_source example translation_as_in_source translation gloss example_source example_page example_comment date 1 East Caucasian Lezgic Agul Central Agul dialect_toplevel yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form magometov1970 140 Maria Starodubtseva zero marker (for sg); -aj (for pl) rux, jik читай', 'умри' read', 'die' read[IMP], die[IMP] magometov1970 140 2 East Caucasian Andic Southern Akhvakh Southern Akhvakh language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes not applicable Distinction in plural form muravyevdraft 20 Maria Starodubtseva -a (for trans); -abe/ame (for intrans) r-eχ-a; b-eq'-abe-la take', 'let come' take', 'let come' NPL-take-OBJ.IMP; HPL-come-IMP-JUSS muravyevdraft NA (20) 3 East Caucasian Andic Northern Akhvakh Northern Akhvakh language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form magomedbekova1967 93 NB! 'строгого разграничения в употреблении суффиксов а, е по переходности не наблюдается' Maria Starodubtseva -a (for trans); -e (for intrans) commonly, but not universally! qin-а; woqʼ-e шей', 'иди (сюда)' sew', 'come' sew-IMP; come-IMP magomedbekova1967 93 4 East Caucasian Andic Upper Andi Gagatli village no yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes not applicable Distinction in plural form salimov2010 189,198 Maria Starodubtseva -o/-on (for trans); zero marker: imp form = part. form with -b (for intrans) bešː-o; bešːib ткать' weave' weave-IMP; weave[IMP] salimov2010 202 5 East Caucasian Andic Upper Andi Zilo village yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes yes Distinction in plural form kayeetaldraft2020 21 Maria Starodubtseva -o/-on (for trans); -b (for intrans) -ul (for intrans) saʁijd-o; rečː-o-b; rečː-o-b-ul heal', 'forget', 'forget' heal', 'forget', 'forget' heal-IMP.SG; forget-IMP.SG; forget-IMP-PL kayeetaldraft2020 21 6 East Caucasian Lezgic Archi Archi language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes yes Distinction in plural form kibrik1977 95(V2) Maria Starodubtseva zero marker -r (for intrans) oci-r остановитесь' stop' stop[IMP]-PL kibrik1977 95 7 Indo-European Armenic Eastern Armenian Eastern Armenian language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form dum-tragut2009 272 Maria Starodubtseva prs/aor stem + -ir/-a patrast-ir prepare' prepare' prepare-IMP.2.SG dum-tragut2009 274 8 East Caucasian Avar Avar Standard Avar language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes not applicable Distinction in plural form forkerdraft2020 12 Maria Starodubtseva -e (for trans), -a (for intrans) ʕin t’am-e; a ear spread (listen)', 'go' ear spread (listen)', 'go' ear spread-IMP; go.IMP forkerdraft2020 12 9 Turkic Oghuz Azerbaijani Standard Azerbaijani language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form shiralievsevortyan1971 114 Maria Starodubtseva zero marker danɯšsana говори' speak' speak[IMP] shiralievsevortyan1971 115 10 East Caucasian Andic Bagvalal Kvanada village yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes not applicable Distinction in plural form kibrik2001 96-97 Maria Starodubtseva -a (for trans); -be or zero (for intrans) rušš-a; mari-be отопри', 'мычи' unlock', 'bellow' unlock-IMP; bellow-IMP kibrik2001 96-97 11 East Caucasian Tsezic Bezhta Bezhta default_level yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes not applicable Distinction in plural form comrieetal2015 378-379 Maria Starodubtseva -a/-æ (for trans); -i/zero marker (for intrans) gitʼ-a; bož налей', 'верь' pour', 'believe' pour-IMP, believe[IMP] comrieetal2015 378-379 12 East Caucasian Andic Botlikh Botlikh village yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes not applicable Distinction in plural form alexeyevverheesdraft2020 17 Three intransitive verbs have an irregular imperative with the suffix -ba. Maria Starodubtseva -a (for trans); -i/-j (for intrans) qward-a; čʼːard-i write', 'run' write', 'run' write-IMP; run-IMP alexeyevverheesdraft2020 NA (17) 13 East Caucasian Lezgic Budukh Budukh language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form talibov2007 202-208 Maria Starodubtseva zero marker, reduction (auslaut vowel/prs suff/masdar suff etc) eš; ix спускайся', 'услышь' descend', 'hear' descend[IMP]; hear[IMP] talibov2007 158 14 East Caucasian Andic Chamalal Lower Gakvari dialect_toplevel yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes yes Distinction in plural form roncero2021 1 Maria Starodubtseva -a/-aː (for trans); -a(b)/-m (for intrans) -i (for intrans) bal-be; jal-bi; čʼin-a зови', 'зовите', 'бей' call', 'call', 'hit' call-IMP.2.SG.; call-IMP.2.PL.; hit-IMP.2.SG. bokarev1949a 93-94 15 East Caucasian Nakh Chechen Standard Chechen language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form molochieva2010 251 three types of imperative Maria Starodubtseva -a (simple imperative) mala drink' drink' drink.IMP molochieva2010 251 16 East Caucasian Dargwa Northern Dargwa Standard Dargwa language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form musaev2002 69 Maria Starodubtseva -a (for trans); -u (for intrans) buc-a; wakʼ-u держи', 'приходи' hold', 'come' hold-IMP; come-IMP musaev2002 69 17 East Caucasian Dargwa Chirag Chirag language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form kibrikkodzasov1988 29 Maria Starodubtseva -a (for trans); -e (for intrans); -(a)ja (for pl) b=alʁ-a; liq-e режь', 'работай' cut','work' cut-IMP; work-IMP kibrikkodzasov1988 29 18 East Caucasian Dargwa Sanzhi-Itsari Itsari dialect_toplevel yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form sumbatovamutalov2003 94 Intransitive marker is optionally omitted Maria Starodubtseva -a/-al (for trans); -i (for intrans); -aja (for pl) b=uc-a; w=išː-(i) holt it', 'sleep' hold', 'sleep' hold-IMP; sleep-IMP sumbatovamutalov2003 94 19 East Caucasian Dargwa Kubachi Kubachi language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes yes Distinction in plural form magometov1963 201 Maria Starodubtseva -a (for trans); -e (for intrans); -(a)ja (for pl) -a(aː) (for intrans) baːq-a; wiːq-e; diːq-aː сделай/сделайте', 'работай', 'работайте' do', 'work', 'work' do-IMP; work-IMP.SG; work-IMP.PL magometov1963 202 applicable for the first conjugation 20 East Caucasian Dargwa Kajtag Kajtag language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form temirbulatova2004 173-174 Maria Starodubtseva -a, -ə(aˤ) (for trans); -i (for intrans) -j/-aˤ (for trans); -aj/-aaˤ (for intrans) - no connection with transitivity! bar-a; ulš-i сделай', 'работай' do', 'work' do-IMP; work-IMP temirbulatova2004 173-174 21 East Caucasian Dargwa Mehweb Mehweb language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form danieletal2019 89 distinction in prf Maria Starodubtseva -a (for trans); -e (for intrans) urs-a; uq-e pound', 'go' pound', 'go' pound-IMP; go-IMP danieletal2019 89 22 East Caucasian Dargwa Southwestern Dargwa Tanti dialect_toplevel yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form sumbatovalander2014 142 Maria Starodubtseva -a/-aˁ (for trans); -e (for intrans); -a/-ja (for pl) b=uc-a; b=itaq-e держи, лови', 'прячься' hold', 'hide' hold-IMP; hide-IMP sumbatovalander2014 142 23 East Caucasian Dargwa Amuzgi-Shiri Shiri dialect_toplevel yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form belyaevdraft2019 106 Maria Starodubtseva -a (for trans); -i (for intrans) barqʼ-a; kejg-i do', 'sit' do', 'sit' do-IMP; sit-IMP belyaevdraft2019 NA (107) 24 Kartvelian Georgic Georgian Standard Georgian language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes not applicable Distinction in plural form hewitt1995 243 Maria Starodubtseva zero marker daxedet look down at X/them' look down' look.down[IMP] hewitt1995 474 25 East Caucasian Andic Godoberi Godoberi language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes not applicable Distinction in plural form kibriketal1996 49 Maria Starodubtseva -a (for trans), -i (for intrans) b=aqʼas-a; b=aq’as-i steal it', 'hide' steal', 'hide' steal-IMP; hide-IMP kibriketal1996 49 26 East Caucasian Tsezic Hinuq Hinuq language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes not applicable Distinction in plural form forker2013 227 Maria Starodubtseva -o (for trans); zero marker (for intrans) kekir-o; Ø-uɬi let', 'go down' let', 'go down' let-IMP; I-go.down[IMP] forker2013 227 27 East Caucasian Tsezic Hunzib Hunzib language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes not applicable Distinction in plural form vandenberg1995 87 Maria Starodubtseva -o (for trans); zero marker (for intrans) čax-o; eːƛʼe write it', 'go' write it', 'go' write-IMP; go[IMP] vandenberg1995 87 28 East Caucasian Nakh Ingush Standard Ingush language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form nichols2011 274 three types of imperative Maria Starodubtseva -a (plain imperative) aala say' say' say.IMP nichols2011 274 29 East Caucasian Andic Karata Karata dialect_toplevel yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes not applicable Distinction in plural form magomedbekova1971 134 Maria Starodubtseva -a (for trans), -i (for intrans) gaχ-a; čːwar-i делай', 'беги' do', 'run' do-IMP; run-IMP magomedbekova1971 134 30 East Caucasian Andic Tukita Tukita language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes not applicable Distinction in plural form magomedbekova1971 135 Maria Starodubtseva -a (for trans), -bi (for intrans) baχ-a; bukʼu-bi принеси', 'будь' bring', 'be' bring-IMP; be-IMP magomedbekova1971 135 31 East Caucasian Khinalug Khinalug Khinalug language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form kibriketal1972 108 Maria Starodubtseva -a/æ/(i/ɯ)r/l (for 2prs.sg.), -e/æ + lun/lus (for 2prs.pl.) kʰ-æ; χ-æ сделай, иди do', 'go' do-IMP.2.SG; go-IMP.2.SG kibriketal1972 109 32 East Caucasian Tsezic Khwarshi Kvantlada village yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes not applicable Distinction in plural form khalilova2009 242-244 Maria Starodubtseva -o/-a/-e (-o as basic one) puƛ-o; durid-o blow', 'run' blow', 'run' blow-IMP, run-IMP khalilova2009 243 33 East Caucasian Lezgic Kryz Alik dialect_toplevel yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form authier2009 151 Поскольку первое и второе лица (призывательный, повелительный) требуют семантической роли агента, непереходные глаголы имеют синтетические формы только для самых активных; некоторые непереходные глаголы не имеют ни повелительного...' Maria Starodubtseva prf base (+ 'ay' in plural) ɣa-b-qʼil-ay; sa-b-zin (-ay) couchez-vous', 'lave(-z)' stay', 'wash' PV-HPL-stay.IMP-HPL; PV-F-wash.IMP(AGHPL) authier2009 153 34 Turkic Kipchak Kumyk Standard Kumyk language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form abdullaevaetal2014 288 Maria Starodubtseva zero marker al бери' take' take[IMP] abdullaevaetal2014 288 35 East Caucasian Lak Lak Standard Lak language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form zhirkov1955 118 Maria Starodubtseva -a/-i/-u (-u commonly used with intrans) čič-a напиши' write' write-IMP zhirkov1955 118 36 East Caucasian Lezgic Lezgian Standard Lezgian language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes not applicable Distinction in plural form haspelmath1993 128 Maria Starodubtseva reduplication of last cons xu-x; čyxy-x become', 'wash' become', 'wash' become-IMP; wash-IMP haspelmath1993 128 37 Turkic Kipchak Nogai Standard Nogai language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form baskakov1973 245 Maria Starodubtseva zero marker bar иди' go' go[IMP] baskakov1973 245 38 East Caucasian Lezgic Rutul Mukhad dialect_toplevel yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes not applicable Distinction in plural form ibragimov1978 90 В повелительном наклонении формант аспекта не сохранился Maria Starodubtseva zero marker hagwa видь' see' see[IMP] ibragimov1978 90 39 East Caucasian Lezgic Rutul Khnov village no yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes not applicable Distinction in plural form authier2023 34 Maria Starodubtseva zero marker hat'v cut' cut' cut[IMP] authier2023 34 40 East Caucasian Lezgic Tabasaran Standard Tabasaran language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form babaliyeva2013 176 Maria Starodubtseva 2prs.sg. imprf base (+ay for pl) lig-ay; ɣač-agan look at', 'come' look at', 'come' look.at.IMP-PL; come.IMP-PTCL babaliyeva2013 178-179 41 Indo-European Iranian Juhuri Juhuri language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form authier2012 174 Maria Starodubtseva zero marker voku ouvre' open' open[IMP] authier2012 174 42 East Caucasian Andic Tindi Tindi village yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes yes Distinction in plural form magomedova2012 166 Maria Starodubtseva -a (for trans), -iba/-ima (for intrans) -i (for intrans) bešːd-a; tʼ-aba; tʼ-abi отпусти', 'беги', 'бегите' let go', 'run' , 'run' let.go-IMP; run-IMP.SG; run-IMP.PL magomedova2012 166 43 East Caucasian Lezgic Tsakhur Mishlesh village yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes not applicable Distinction in plural form kibrik1999 76 Maria Starodubtseva -e (+ reduction u/i) a:q-e открой' open' open-IMP kibrik1999 76 44 East Caucasian Tsezic Tsez Tsez language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives yes General distinction in suffixes not applicable Distinction in plural form comrie2007 1202 different forms for derived and non-derived transitive verbs Maria Starodubtseva -o (for non-derived trans), zero marker (for intrans and derived trans) cax-o; kec write', 'sleep' write', 'sleep' write-IMP; sleep[IMP] comrie2007 1202 45 East Caucasian Nakh Tsova-Tush Zemo-Alvani village yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form desheriev1953 132 Maria Starodubtseva zero marker/-b, -at/-t (in pl.) kχos брось' throw' throw[IMP] desheriev1953 132 46 East Caucasian Lezgic Udi Udi language yes yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form schulze1982 162-164 Maria Starodubtseva -a (2prs.), -en (1prs.pl.), -e(not much information) karx-a lebe' live' live-IMP schulze1982 163 47 East Caucasian Lezgic Udi Nizh dialect_toplevel no yes Distinction between transitive and intransitive imperatives no General distinction in suffixes no Distinction in plural form alekseevetal2008 117 Maria Starodubtseva -a (2prs.), -i (for 6 verbs of movement) up-a скажи' say' say-IMP alekseevetal2008 117